Tennessee, session 114, SB0520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1101(b), is amended by
deleting "Hatchie, Loosahatchie, Obion and Forked Deer River basins" and substituting "river
basins in the authority service area".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1101(b)(4), is amended by
deleting "and the creek and river basins that flow through the counties of Benton, Decatur and
Hardin into the Tennessee River" and substituting "through education, outreach, and science".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1101, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(c)
(1) These activities are accomplished in the authority service area that is
composed of Lauderdale, Lake, Dyer, Obion, Madison, Weakley, Henry, Gibson,
Carroll, Benton, Decatur, Hardin, Haywood, Crockett, Henderson, Chester,
McNairy, Tipton, Fayette, Hardeman, Perry, Stewart, Houston, and Humphreys
counties.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1), when conducting activities in
Perry, Stewart, Houston, or Humphreys county, the authority shall only provide
technical assistance, engineering services, and project management support to
such county.
SB0520
000436
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1103, is amended by deleting
"Hatchie, Obion and Forked Deer River basins" in subdivisions (7) and (8) and substituting
"authority service area".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1103, is amended by deleting
subdivision (16) and substituting:
(16) Obtain funds from county governments for purposes of planning, acquisition
of land and facilities, and construction, operation, management, and maintenance of all
works, facilities, and programs particularly required by such county or counties. County
governments are empowered, but are not required, to impose taxes to accomplish these
programs. Such taxes, if imposed, must be upon all real property lying within the
authority service area as situated in the respective counties, and such tax shall be
imposed on that property determined by the county as benefiting from the works of
improvement and programs of the authority;
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1103(18), is amended by
deleting "the Obion-Forked Deer basin authority" and substituting "the authority".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1104(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "Hatchie, Obion and Forked Deer River basins" and substituting "authority service
area".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1104(b), is amended by
deleting "for the Hatchie, Obion, and Forked Deer River basins".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-1109(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(a)
(1) This part applies only to the counties of Lauderdale, Lake, Dyer,
Obion, Madison, Weakley, Henry, Gibson, Carroll, Benton, Decatur, Hardin,
- 2 - 000436

Haywood, Crockett, Henderson, Chester, Tipton, Hardeman, Fayette, McNairy,
Houston, Humphreys, Stewart, and Perry, which may, upon approval by a
majority vote of the respective county legislative body, elect to participate in such
programs as set out in this part, except as provided in § 64-1-1101(c)(2).
(2) If such an election is made, this part applies to all counties making
such an election, except as provided in § 64-1-1101(c)(2).
SECTION 10. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 000436